6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX a4 Y 103
SFX a4 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er po:infi
SFX a4 er ant/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er po:ppre
SFX a4 cer çant/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:ppre
SFX a4 ger geant/n'q'l'm't's' ger po:ppre
SFX a4 er e/n'q'j'l'm't's' [^y]er po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX a4 yer ye/n'q'j'l'm't's' [^ou]yer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX a4 yer ie/n'q'j'l'm't's' [aou]yer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX a4 er è/n'q'l'm't' er po:ipre po:1isg
SFX a4 er es/n'q'l'm't' [^y]er po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX a4 yer yes/n'q'l'm't' [^ou]yer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX a4 yer ies/n'q'l'm't' [aou]yer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX a4 er ons/n'q'l't' [^cg]er po:ipre po:1pl
SFX a4 cer çons/n'q'l't' cer po:ipre po:1pl
SFX a4 ger geons/n'q'l't' ger po:ipre po:1pl
SFX a4 er ez/n'q'l'm' er po:ipre po:2pl
SFX a4 er ent/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX a4 yer yent/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX a4 yer ient/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX a4 er ais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^cg]er po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX a4 cer çais/n'q'j'l'm't' cer po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX a4 ger geais/n'q'j'l'm't' ger po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX a4 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er po:iimp po:3sg
SFX a4 cer çait/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:iimp po:3sg
SFX a4 ger geait/n'q'l'm't's' ger po:iimp po:3sg
SFX a4 er ions/n'q'l't' er po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX a4 er iez/n'q'l'm' er po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX a4 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er po:iimp po:3pl
SFX a4 cer çaient/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:iimp po:3pl
SFX a4 ger geaient/n'q'l'm't's' ger po:iimp po:3pl
SFX a4 er ai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX a4 cer çai/n'q'j'l'm't' cer po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX a4 ger geai/n'q'j'l'm't' ger po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX a4 er as/n'q'l'm't' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX a4 cer ças/n'q'l'm't' cer po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX a4 ger geas/n'q'l'm't' ger po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX a4 er a/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX a4 cer ça/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX a4 ger gea/n'q'l'm't's' ger po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX a4 er âmes/n'q'l't' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX a4 cer çâmes/n'q'l't' cer po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX a4 ger geâmes/n'q'l't' ger po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX a4 er âtes/n'q'l'm' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX a4 cer çâtes/n'q'l'm' cer po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX a4 ger geâtes/n'q'l'm' ger po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX a4 er èrent/n'q'l'm't's' er po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX a4 er erai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^y]er po:ifut po:1sg
SFX a4 yer yerai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^ou]yer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX a4 yer ierai/n'q'j'l'm't' [aou]yer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX a4 er eras/n'q'l'm't' [^y]er po:ifut po:2sg
SFX a4 yer yeras/n'q'l'm't' [^ou]yer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX a4 yer ieras/n'q'l'm't' [aou]yer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX a4 er era/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er po:ifut po:3sg
SFX a4 yer yera/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX a4 yer iera/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX a4 er erons/n'q'l't' [^y]er po:ifut po:1pl
SFX a4 yer yerons/n'q'l't' [^ou]yer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX a4 yer ierons/n'q'l't' [aou]yer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX a4 er erez/n'q'l'm' [^y]er po:ifut po:2pl
SFX a4 yer yerez/n'q'l'm' [^ou]yer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX a4 yer ierez/n'q'l'm' [aou]yer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX a4 er eront/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX a4 yer yeront/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX a4 yer ieront/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX a4 er erais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^y]er po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX a4 yer yerais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^ou]yer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX a4 yer ierais/n'q'j'l'm't' [aou]yer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX a4 er erait/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er po:cond po:3sg
SFX a4 yer yerait/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer po:cond po:3sg
SFX a4 yer ierait/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer po:cond po:3sg
SFX a4 er erions/n'q'l't' [^y]er po:cond po:1pl
SFX a4 yer yerions/n'q'l't' [^ou]yer po:cond po:1pl
SFX a4 yer ierions/n'q'l't' [aou]yer po:cond po:1pl
SFX a4 er eriez/n'q'l'm' [^y]er po:cond po:2pl
SFX a4 yer yeriez/n'q'l'm' [^ou]yer po:cond po:2pl
SFX a4 yer ieriez/n'q'l'm' [aou]yer po:cond po:2pl
SFX a4 er eraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^y]er po:cond po:3pl
SFX a4 yer yeraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^ou]yer po:cond po:3pl
SFX a4 yer ieraient/n'q'l'm't's' [aou]yer po:cond po:3pl
SFX a4 er asse/n'q'j'l'm't' [^cg]er po:simp po:1sg
SFX a4 cer çasse/n'q'j'l'm't' cer po:simp po:1sg
SFX a4 ger geasse/n'q'j'l'm't' ger po:simp po:1sg
SFX a4 er asses/n'q'l'm't' [^cg]er po:simp po:2sg
SFX a4 cer çasses/n'q'l'm't' cer po:simp po:2sg
SFX a4 ger geasses/n'q'l'm't' ger po:simp po:2sg
SFX a4 er ât/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er po:simp po:3sg
SFX a4 cer çât/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:simp po:3sg
SFX a4 ger geât/n'q'l'm't's' ger po:simp po:3sg
SFX a4 er assions/n'q'l't' [^cg]er po:simp po:1pl
SFX a4 cer çassions/n'q'l't' cer po:simp po:1pl
SFX a4 ger geassions/n'q'l't' ger po:simp po:1pl
SFX a4 er assiez/n'q'l'm' [^cg]er po:simp po:2pl
SFX a4 cer çassiez/n'q'l'm' cer po:simp po:2pl
SFX a4 ger geassiez/n'q'l'm' ger po:simp po:2pl
SFX a4 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er po:simp po:3pl
SFX a4 cer çassent/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:simp po:3pl
SFX a4 ger geassent/n'q'l'm't's' ger po:simp po:3pl
SFX a4 er e/n'l'm't' [^y]er po:impe po:2sg
SFX a4 yer ye/n'l'm't' [^ou]yer po:impe po:2sg
SFX a4 yer ie/n'l'm't' [aou]yer po:impe po:2sg
SFX a4 er ons/n'l' [^cg]er po:impe po:1pl
SFX a4 cer çons/n'l' cer po:impe po:1pl
SFX a4 ger geons/n'l' ger po:impe po:1pl
SFX a4 er ez/n'l'm' er po:impe po:2pl
