6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.dic
abandonner/a4p+()
abimer/a4p+()
abîmer/a4p+()
ablater/a4p+()
abonner/a4p+()
aborder/a4p+()
aboucher/a4p+()
abouler/a4p+()
abraser/a4p+()
abreuver/a4p+()
abriter/a4p+()
absenter/a4p+()
absorber/a4p+()
abuser/a4p+()
accabler/a4p+()
accentuer/a4p+()
accepter/a4p+()
acclimater/a4p+()
accoler/a4p+()
accommoder/a4p+()
accompagner/a4p+()
accoquiner/a4p+()
accorder/a4p+()
accoster/a4p+()
accoter/a4p+()
accoucher/a4p+()
accoupler/a4p+()
accoutrer/a4p+()
accoutumer/a4p+()
accréditer/a4p+()
accrocher/a4p+()
accumuler/a4p+()
accuser/a4p+()
acharner/a4p+()
acheminer/a4p+()
achopper/a4p+()
acidifier/a4p+()
acquitter/a4p+()
activer/a4p+()
adapter/a4p+()
additionner/a4p+()
adjuger/a4p+()
administrer/a4p+()
admirer/a4p+()
admonester/a4p+()
adorer/a4p+()
adorner/a4p+()
adosser/a4p+()
adresser/a4p+()
aduler/a4p+()
affaisser/a4p+()
affaler/a4p+()
affecter/a4p+()
afficher/a4p+()
affilier/a4p+()
affiner/a4p+()
affirmer/a4p+()
affliger/a4p+()
affoler/a4p+()
affronter/a4p+()
affubler/a4p+()
africaniser/a4p+()
agacer/a4p+()
agencer/a4p+()
agglutiner/a4p+()
aggraver/a4p+()
agiter/a4p+()
agréer/a4p+()
agripper/a4p+()
aider/a4p+()
aiguiser/a4p+()
aimanter/a4p+()
aimer/a4p+()
ajouter/a4p+()
ajuster/a4p+()
alarmer/a4p+()
alcooliser/a4p+()
aligner/a4p+()
alimenter/a4p+()
aliter/a4p+()
alkyler/a4p+()
allier/a4p+()
allonger/a4p+()
allouer/a4p+()
allumer/a4p+()
amalgamer/a4p+()
amariner/a4p+()
amarrer/a4p+()
amasser/a4p+()
améliorer/a4p+()
aménager/a4p+()
amender/a4p+()
américaniser/a4p+()
ameuter/a4p+()
amocher/a4p+()
amorcer/a4p+()
amplifier/a4p+()
amputer/a4p+()
amuser/a4p+()
analyser/a4p+()
anamostoser/a4p+()
ancrer/a4p+()
anesthésier/a4p+()
angéliser/a4p+()
angliciser/a4p+()
angoisser/a4p+()
animer/a4p+()
ankyloser/a4p+()
annexer/a4p+()
annihiler/a4p+()
annoncer/a4p+()
annuler/a4p+()
anonymiser/a4p+()
anthropomorphiser/a4p+()
apaiser/a4p+()
apitoyer/a4p+()
aplomber/a4p+()
apostropher/a4p+()
appareiller/a4p+()
apparenter/a4p+()
apparier/a4p+()
appliquer/a4p+()
appointer/a4p+()
apprécier/a4p+()
apprêter/a4p+()
apprivoiser/a4p+()
approcher/a4p+()
approprier/a4p+()
approuver/a4p+()
approvisionner/a4p+()
appuyer/a4p+()
arabiser/a4p+()
arcbouter/a4p+()
arc-bouter/a4p+()
argenter/a4p+()
arguer/a4p+()
argüer/a4p+()
armer/a4p+()
arquer/a4p+()
arracher/a4p+()
arranger/a4p+()
arrêter/a4p+()
arroser/a4p+()
articuler/a4p+()
artificialiser/a4p+()
asperger/a4p+()
asphyxier/a4p+()
aspirer/a4p+()
assembler/a4p+()
assibiler/a4p+()
assimiler/a4p+()
associer/a4p+()
assommer/a4p+()
assumer/a4p+()
assurer/a4p+()
atomiser/a4p+()
atrophier/a4p+()
attabler/a4p+()
attacher/a4p+()
attaquer/a4p+()
atténuer/a4p+()
attifer/a4p+()
attirer/a4p+()
attoucher/a4p+()
attraper/a4p+()
attribuer/a4p+()
attrister/a4p+()
attrouper/a4p+()
augmenter/a4p+()
auréoler/a4p+()
ausculter/a4p+()
authentifier/a4p+()
autocompenser/a4p+()
auto-compenser/a4p+()
autofinancer/a4p+()
autonomiser/a4p+()
autoriser/a4p+()
avancer/a4p+()
avarier/a4p+()
aventurer/a4p+()
aveugler/a4p+()
aviser/a4p+()
avitailler/a4p+()
avoisiner/a4p+()
avouer/a4p+()
axer/a4p+()
désentrelacer/a4p+()
ébaucher/a4p+()
éborgner/a4p+()
ébouillanter/a4p+()
ébouler/a4p+()
ébranler/a4p+()
ébruiter/a4p+()
écailler/a4p+()
écaler/a4p+()
écarter/a4p+()
échanger/a4p+()
échapper/a4p+()
écharper/a4p+()
échauder/a4p+()
échauffer/a4p+()
échelonner/a4p+()
échiner/a4p+()
échouer/a4p+()
éclabousser/a4p+()
éclairer/a4p+()
éclater/a4p+()
éclipser/a4p+()
économiser/a4p+()
écorcher/a4p+()
écouler/a4p+()
écouter/a4p+()
écraser/a4p+()
effacer/a4p+()
effarer/a4p+()
effaroucher/a4p+()
effectuer/a4p+()
efféminer/a4p+()
effeuiller/a4p+()
effiler/a4p+()
effilocher/a4p+()
efflanquer/a4p+()
effondrer/a4p+()
effranger/a4p+()
effrayer/a4p+()
effriter/a4p+()
égarer/a4p+()
égayer/a4p+()
égorger/a4p+()
égoutter/a4p+()
égrainer/a4p+()
égratigner/a4p+()
éjecter/a4p+()
élaborer/a4p+()
élancer/a4p+()
électrocuter/a4p+()
élider/a4p+()
éliminer/a4p+()
éloigner/a4p+()
émacier/a4p+()
emballer/a4p+()
embarder/a4p+()
embarquer/a4p+()
embarrer/a4p+()
emberlificoter/a4p+()
emboiter/a4p+()
embosser/a4p+()
embourber/a4p+()
embourrer/a4p+()
embraser/a4p+()
embrigader/a4p+()
embrocher/a4p+()
embroussailler/a4p+()
embusquer/a4p+()
émietter/a4p+()
emmancher/a4p+()
emmerder/a4p+()
emmurer/a4p+()
émousser/a4p+()
empaler/a4p+()
empêcher/a4p+()
empêtrer/a4p+()
empirer/a4p+()
employer/a4p+()
empoisonner/a4p+()
empourprer/a4p+()
encadrer/a4p+()
encanailler/a4p+()
encastrer/a4p+()
enchainer/a4p+()
enchanter/a4p+()
enchevêtrer/a4p+()
enclencher/a4p+()
encombrer/a4p+()
encourager/a4p+()
encrouter/a4p+()
endetter/a4p+()
énerver/a4p+()
enfermer/a4p+()
enfiler/a4p+()
enfler/a4p+()
enfourner/a4p+()
engager/a4p+()
engorger/a4p+()
engrainer/a4p+()
engueuler/a4p+()
enjoliver/a4p+()
enlacer/a4p+()
ennuager/a4p+()
énoncer/a4p+()
enraciner/a4p+()
enregistrer/a4p+()
enrober/a4p+()
enrouer/a4p+()
enrubanner/a4p+()
enseigner/a4p+()
entailler/a4p+()
entasser/a4p+()
entêter/a4p+()
entifler/a4p+()
entourer/a4p+()
entraîner/a4p+()
entrechoquer/a4p+()
entrecroiser/a4p+()
entremêler/a4p+()
entre-tisser/a4p+()
envaser/a4p+()
envenimer/a4p+()
épancher/a4p+()
éparpiller/a4p+()
épauler/a4p+()
épier/a4p+()
épiloguer/a4p+()
éponger/a4p+()
épouser/a4p+()
éprouver/a4p+()
épuiser/a4p+()
équilibrer/a4p+()
équipoller/a4p+()
érailler/a4p+()
ériger/a4p+()
escagasser/a4p+()
esclavagiser/a4p+()
esprofonder/a4p+()
esquinter/a4p+()
esquiver/a4p+()
essentialiser/a4p+()
essouffler/a4p+()
estimer/a4p+()
estropier/a4p+()
étaler/a4p+()
éterniser/a4p+()
étirer/a4p+()
étoiler/a4p+()
étouffer/a4p+()
étriper/a4p+()
euphémiser/a4p+()
évacuer/a4p+()
évaporer/a4p+()
éveiller/a4p+()
éventrer/a4p+()
exacerber/a4p+()
examiner/a4p+()
exciter/a4p+()
exécuter/a4p+()
exercer/a4p+()
exhaler/a4p+()
exhorter/a4p+()
expatrier/a4p+()
expliquer/a4p+()
exposer/a4p+()
expulser/a4p+()
extérioriser/a4p+()
extravaser/a4p+()
habiller/a4p+()
harmoniser/a4p+()
hispaniser/a4p+()
honorer/a4p+()
humecter/a4p+()
humilier/a4p+()
hydrater/a4p+()
hypnotiser/a4p+()
identifier/a4p+()
ignorer/a4p+()
illusionner/a4p+()
imaginer/a4p+()
imbriquer/a4p+()
immerger/a4p+()
immoler/a4p+()
immuniser/a4p+()
impatroniser/a4p+()
impliquer/a4p+()
imposer/a4p+()
improviser/a4p+()
incarner/a4p+()
incorporer/a4p+()
incruster/a4p+()
indemniser/a4p+()
individualiser/a4p+()
industrialiser/a4p+()
infecter/a4p+()
infiltrer/a4p+()
informatiser/a4p+()
initier/a4p+()
injurier/a4p+()
inonder/a4p+()
insinuer/a4p+()
installer/a4p+()
instituer/a4p+()
insulter/a4p+()
intercaler/a4p+()
internationaliser/a4p+()
interroger/a4p+()
intoxiquer/a4p+()
inventer/a4p+()
invisibiliser/a4p+()
iriser/a4p+()
irriter/a4p+()
isoler/a4p+()
objectiver/a4p+()
observer/a4p+()
occidentaliser/a4p+()
octroyer/a4p+()
offusquer/a4p+()
opposer/a4p+()
organiser/a4p+()
orienter/a4p+()
orner/a4p+()
orthographier/a4p+()
ôter/a4p+()
outiller/a4p+()
oxyder/a4p+()
universaliser/a4p+()
user/a4p+()
